District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.18

Proceeds from sales of excess vehicles.

Effective October 19, 2000, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, police vehicles purchased for the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) which have been declared excess, either through age or mechanical faults, shall be auctioned, or otherwise disposed of by the MPD. Revenue not to exceed $500,000 generated by auction or other means of disposal shall be returned to the MPD as Other Revenue, to be used expressly for the purchase of specialty replacement vehicles, including motorcycles. Any revenue in excess of $500,000 shall revert to the General Fund.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 802, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 802 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).